Utah statutes.
76-10-201.   Interference with water flow.

Every person who knowingly or intentionally interferes with or alters the flow of water in any stream, ditch, or lateral while under the control or management of any water commissioner is guilty of a crime punishable under Section 73-2-27.



Amended by Chapter 215, 2005 General Session

